language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 365 Y 31
SFX 365 0 a .
SFX 365 0 ach .
SFX 365 0 am .
SFX 365 0 ami .
SFX 365 0 e .
SFX 365 0 eg .
SFX 365 0 ego .
SFX 365 0 ej .
SFX 365 0 eje .
SFX 365 0 eju .
SFX 365 0 em .
SFX 365 0 emu .
SFX 365 0 ijo .
SFX 365 0 ijom .
SFX 365 0 ijomej .
SFX 365 0 ijomy .
SFX 365 0 ijotej .
SFX 365 0 ijośo .
SFX 365 0 ijoš .
SFX 365 0 iju .
SFX 365 0 oju .
SFX 365 0 om .
SFX 365 0 oma .
SFX 365 0 ow .
SFX 365 0 owu .
SFX 365 0 u .
SFX 365 0 y .
SFX 365 0 ych .
SFX 365 0 ym .
SFX 365 0 yma .
SFX 365 0 ymi .
SFX 366 Y 31
SFX 366 0 a .
SFX 366 0 ach .
SFX 366 0 am .
SFX 366 0 ami .
SFX 366 0 e .
SFX 366 0 eg .
SFX 366 0 ego .
SFX 366 0 ej .
SFX 366 0 eje .
SFX 366 0 eju .
SFX 366 0 em .
SFX 366 0 emu .
SFX 366 0 i .
SFX 366 0 im .
SFX 366 0 imej .
SFX 366 0 imy .
SFX 366 0 itej .
SFX 366 0 iśo .
SFX 366 0 iš .
SFX 366 0 o .
SFX 366 0 oju .
SFX 366 0 om .
SFX 366 0 oma .
SFX 366 0 ow .
SFX 366 0 owu .
SFX 366 0 u .
SFX 366 0 y .
SFX 366 0 ych .
SFX 366 0 ym .
SFX 366 0 yma .
SFX 366 0 ymi .
SFX 367 Y 30
SFX 367 0 a .
SFX 367 0 ach .
SFX 367 0 am .
SFX 367 0 ami .
SFX 367 0 e .
SFX 367 0 eg .
SFX 367 0 ego .
SFX 367 0 ej .
SFX 367 0 eje .
SFX 367 0 eju .
SFX 367 0 em .
SFX 367 0 emu .
SFX 367 0 i .
SFX 367 0 im .
SFX 367 0 imej .
SFX 367 0 imy .
SFX 367 0 itej .
SFX 367 0 iśo .
SFX 367 0 iš .
SFX 367 0 oju .
SFX 367 0 om .
SFX 367 0 oma .
SFX 367 0 ow .
SFX 367 0 owu .
SFX 367 0 u .
SFX 367 0 y .
SFX 367 0 ych .
SFX 367 0 ym .
SFX 367 0 yma .
SFX 367 0 ymi .
SFX 368 Y 30
SFX 368 0 a .
SFX 368 0 ach .
SFX 368 0 am .
SFX 368 0 ami .
SFX 368 0 e .
SFX 368 0 eg .
SFX 368 0 ego .
SFX 368 0 ej .
SFX 368 0 eje .
SFX 368 0 eju .
SFX 368 0 em .
SFX 368 0 emu .
SFX 368 0 i .
SFX 368 0 im .
SFX 368 0 imej .
SFX 368 0 imy .
SFX 368 0 itej .
SFX 368 0 iśo .
SFX 368 0 iš .
SFX 368 0 oju .
SFX 368 0 om .
SFX 368 0 oma .
SFX 368 0 ow .
SFX 368 0 owu .
SFX 368 0 u .
SFX 368 0 y .
SFX 368 0 ych .
SFX 368 0 ym .
SFX 368 0 yma .
SFX 368 0 ymi .
SFX 369 Y 11
SFX 369 0 e .
SFX 369 0 eg .
SFX 369 0 ego .
SFX 369 0 ej .
SFX 369 0 eju .
SFX 369 0 em .
SFX 369 0 emu .
SFX 369 0 ych .
SFX 369 0 ym .
SFX 369 0 yma .
SFX 369 0 ymi .
SFX 370 Y 12
SFX 370 0 e .
SFX 370 0 eg .
SFX 370 0 ego .
SFX 370 0 ej .
SFX 370 0 eju .
SFX 370 0 em .
SFX 370 0 emu .
SFX 370 0 y .
SFX 370 0 ych .
SFX 370 0 ym .
SFX 370 0 yma .
SFX 370 0 ymi .
SFX 371 Y 13
SFX 371 0 e .
SFX 371 0 eg .
SFX 371 0 ego .
SFX 371 0 ej .
SFX 371 0 eju .
SFX 371 0 em .
SFX 371 0 emu .
SFX 371 0 i .
SFX 371 0 y .
SFX 371 0 ych .
SFX 371 0 ym .
SFX 371 0 yma .
SFX 371 0 ymi .
SFX 372 Y 14
SFX 372 0 a .
SFX 372 0 e .
SFX 372 0 ej .
SFX 372 0 eje .
SFX 372 0 eju .
SFX 372 0 o .
SFX 372 0 og .
SFX 372 0 ogo .
SFX 372 0 om .
SFX 372 0 omu .
SFX 372 0 u .
SFX 372 0 ych .
SFX 372 0 ym .
SFX 372 0 ymi .
SFX 373 Y 12
SFX 373 0 ijo .
SFX 373 0 ijom .
SFX 373 0 ijomej .
SFX 373 0 ijomy .
SFX 373 0 ijotej .
SFX 373 0 ijośo .
SFX 373 0 ijoš .
SFX 373 0 iju .
SFX 373 0 mej .
SFX 373 0 my .
SFX 373 0 tej .
SFX 373 0 śo .
SFX 374 Y 13
SFX 374 0 e .
SFX 374 0 ijo .
SFX 374 0 ijom .
SFX 374 0 ijomej .
SFX 374 0 ijomy .
SFX 374 0 ijotej .
SFX 374 0 ijośo .
SFX 374 0 ijoš .
SFX 374 0 iju .
SFX 374 0 mej .
SFX 374 0 my .
SFX 374 0 tej .
SFX 374 0 śo .
SFX 375 Y 13
SFX 375 0 i .
SFX 375 0 ijo .
SFX 375 0 ijom .
SFX 375 0 ijomej .
SFX 375 0 ijomy .
SFX 375 0 ijotej .
SFX 375 0 ijośo .
SFX 375 0 ijoš .
SFX 375 0 iju .
SFX 375 0 mej .
SFX 375 0 my .
SFX 375 0 tej .
SFX 375 0 śo .
SFX 376 Y 12
SFX 376 0 ijo .
SFX 376 0 ijom .
SFX 376 0 ijomej .
SFX 376 0 ijomy .
SFX 376 0 ijotej .
SFX 376 0 ijośo .
SFX 376 0 ijoš .
SFX 376 0 iju .
SFX 376 0 mej .
SFX 376 0 my .
SFX 376 0 tej .
SFX 376 0 ćo .
SFX 377 Y 13
SFX 377 0 e .
SFX 377 0 ijo .
SFX 377 0 ijom .
SFX 377 0 ijomej .
SFX 377 0 ijomy .
SFX 377 0 ijotej .
SFX 377 0 ijośo .
SFX 377 0 ijoš .
SFX 377 0 iju .
SFX 377 0 mej .
SFX 377 0 my .
SFX 377 0 tej .
SFX 377 0 ćo .
SFX 378 Y 7
SFX 378 0 ach .
SFX 378 0 achmej .
SFX 378 0 achmy .
SFX 378 0 achu .
SFX 378 0 ašo .
SFX 378 0 aštej .
SFX 378 0 ašćo .
SFX 379 Y 8
SFX 379 0 ach .
SFX 379 0 achmej .
SFX 379 0 achmy .
SFX 379 0 achu .
SFX 379 0 ašo .
SFX 379 0 aštej .
SFX 379 0 ašćo .
SFX 379 0 e .
SFX 380 Y 28
SFX 380 0 a .
SFX 380 0 ach .
SFX 380 0 am .
SFX 380 0 ami .
SFX 380 0 e .
SFX 380 0 ech .
SFX 380 0 echmej .
SFX 380 0 echmy .
SFX 380 0 echu .
SFX 380 0 ešo .
SFX 380 0 eštej .
SFX 380 0 ešćo .
SFX 380 0 mej .
SFX 380 0 my .
SFX 380 0 o .
SFX 380 0 oju .
SFX 380 0 om .
SFX 380 0 oma .
SFX 380 0 omej .
SFX 380 0 omy .
SFX 380 0 otej .
SFX 380 0 ow .
SFX 380 0 owu .
SFX 380 0 ośo .
SFX 380 0 oš .
SFX 380 0 tej .
SFX 380 0 u .
SFX 380 0 ćo .
SFX 381 Y 9
SFX 381 0 j .
SFX 381 0 jmej .
SFX 381 0 jmy .
SFX 381 0 jtej .
SFX 381 0 jśo .
SFX 381 0 mej .
SFX 381 0 my .
SFX 381 0 tej .
SFX 381 0 śo .
SFX 382 Y 27
SFX 382 0 a .
SFX 382 0 ach .
SFX 382 0 achmej .
SFX 382 0 achmy .
SFX 382 0 achu .
SFX 382 0 am .
SFX 382 0 ami .
SFX 382 0 ašo .
SFX 382 0 aštej .
SFX 382 0 ašćo .
SFX 382 0 e .
SFX 382 0 mej .
SFX 382 0 my .
SFX 382 0 oma .
SFX 382 0 ow .
SFX 382 0 owu .
SFX 382 0 tej .
SFX 382 0 u .
SFX 382 0 y .
SFX 382 0 ym .
SFX 382 0 ymej .
SFX 382 0 ymi .
SFX 382 0 ymy .
SFX 382 0 ytej .
SFX 382 0 yśo .
SFX 382 0 yš .
SFX 382 0 ćo .
SFX 383 Y 19
SFX 383 0 i .
SFX 383 0 imej .
SFX 383 0 imy .
SFX 383 0 itej .
SFX 383 0 iśo .
SFX 383 0 o .
SFX 383 0 om .
SFX 383 0 omej .
SFX 383 0 omy .
SFX 383 0 otej .
SFX 383 0 ośo .
SFX 383 0 oš .
SFX 383 0 ěch .
SFX 383 0 ěchmej .
SFX 383 0 ěchmy .
SFX 383 0 ěchu .
SFX 383 0 ěšo .
SFX 383 0 ěštej .
SFX 383 0 ěšćo .
SFX 384 Y 19
SFX 384 0 i .
SFX 384 0 imej .
SFX 384 0 imy .
SFX 384 0 itej .
SFX 384 0 iśo .
SFX 384 0 o .
SFX 384 0 om .
SFX 384 0 omej .
SFX 384 0 omy .
SFX 384 0 otej .
SFX 384 0 ośo .
SFX 384 0 oš .
SFX 384 0 ěch .
SFX 384 0 ěchmej .
SFX 384 0 ěchmy .
SFX 384 0 ěchu .
SFX 384 0 ěšo .
SFX 384 0 ěštej .
SFX 384 0 ěšćo .
SFX 385 Y 29
SFX 385 0 a .
SFX 385 0 ach .
SFX 385 0 achmej .
SFX 385 0 achmy .
SFX 385 0 achu .
SFX 385 0 am .
SFX 385 0 ami .
SFX 385 0 ašo .
SFX 385 0 aštej .
SFX 385 0 ašćo .
SFX 385 0 e .
SFX 385 0 mej .
SFX 385 0 my .
SFX 385 0 o .
SFX 385 0 oju .
SFX 385 0 om .
SFX 385 0 oma .
SFX 385 0 ow .
SFX 385 0 owu .
SFX 385 0 tej .
SFX 385 0 u .
SFX 385 0 y .
SFX 385 0 ym .
SFX 385 0 ymej .
SFX 385 0 ymy .
SFX 385 0 ytej .
SFX 385 0 yśo .
SFX 385 0 yš .
SFX 385 0 ćo .
SFX 386 Y 28
SFX 386 0 a .
SFX 386 0 ach .
SFX 386 0 achmej .
SFX 386 0 achmy .
SFX 386 0 achu .
SFX 386 0 am .
SFX 386 0 ami .
SFX 386 0 ašo .
SFX 386 0 aštej .
SFX 386 0 ašćo .
SFX 386 0 e .
SFX 386 0 mej .
SFX 386 0 my .
SFX 386 0 oju .
SFX 386 0 om .
SFX 386 0 oma .
SFX 386 0 ow .
SFX 386 0 owu .
SFX 386 0 tej .
SFX 386 0 u .
SFX 386 0 y .
SFX 386 0 ym .
SFX 386 0 ymej .
SFX 386 0 ymy .
SFX 386 0 ytej .
SFX 386 0 yśo .
SFX 386 0 yš .
SFX 386 0 ćo .
SFX 387 Y 15
SFX 387 0 a .
SFX 387 0 e .
SFX 387 0 eg .
SFX 387 0 ego .
SFX 387 0 ej .
SFX 387 0 eje .
SFX 387 0 eju .
SFX 387 0 em .
SFX 387 0 emu .
SFX 387 0 i .
SFX 387 0 ich .
SFX 387 0 im .
SFX 387 0 ima .
SFX 387 0 imi .
SFX 387 0 u .
SFX 388 Y 15
SFX 388 0 a .
SFX 388 0 e .
SFX 388 0 eg .
SFX 388 0 ego .
SFX 388 0 ej .
SFX 388 0 eje .
SFX 388 0 eju .
SFX 388 0 em .
SFX 388 0 emu .
SFX 388 0 i .
SFX 388 0 ich .
SFX 388 0 im .
SFX 388 0 ima .
SFX 388 0 imi .
SFX 388 0 u .
SFX 389 Y 27
SFX 389 0 ach .
SFX 389 0 achmej .
SFX 389 0 achmy .
SFX 389 0 achu .
SFX 389 0 ašo .
SFX 389 0 aštej .
SFX 389 0 ašćo .
SFX 389 0 e .
SFX 389 0 i .
SFX 389 0 ijo .
SFX 389 0 ijom .
SFX 389 0 ijomej .
SFX 389 0 ijomy .
SFX 389 0 ijotej .
SFX 389 0 ijośo .
SFX 389 0 ijoš .
SFX 389 0 iju .
SFX 389 0 im .
SFX 389 0 imej .
SFX 389 0 imy .
SFX 389 0 itej .
SFX 389 0 iśo .
SFX 389 0 iš .
SFX 389 0 mej .
SFX 389 0 my .
SFX 389 0 tej .
SFX 389 0 ćo .
