language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.dic
Bartlicyn/1,370
Bartolicyn/1,370
Bartycyn/1,370
Bańkelow/1,370
Bjelicyn/1,370
Bjelkow/1,370
Bodarjow/1,370
Bogat/1,370
Brjuchacow/1,370
Bzen/1,369
Bělicyn/1,370
Grub/1,370
Gół/1,370
Głodn/1,370
Marw/1,370
Mił/1,370
Mjelow/1,370
Młod/1,370
Nagorin/1,370
Nagł/1,370
Nakoncn/1,370
Nowotn/1,371
Nugełow/1,370
Prejlopow/1,370
Pšyn/1,369
Rjasn/1,369
Smrjod/1,370
Srjen/1,370
Star/1,370
Tłust/1,370
aksiomatisk/1,387
aretěrowańsk/1,387
basnickaŕsk/1,387
blabj/1,379
bubnowańsk/1,387
bědnj/1,379
błazn/1,367
centristisk/1,387
chropj/1,379
ciwilsłužec/1,370
clij/1,378
cłońsk/1,387
dan/368
darj/1,379
dobr/366
dolinkojsk/1,387
dowuchwal/373
dowuwjerś/376
dozdrjal/375
dozněj/1,378
drjažnj/1,379
dyrdakojsk/1,387
europsk/1,387
galilejsk/1,387
glucnj/1,379
grodsk/1,387
głos/386
haptisk/1,387
hol/373
indoarisk/1,387
jadnak/388
jež/386
jubilaŕsk/1,387
kjandroz/386
kjarmj/1,379
klempnaŕsk/1,387
kmótš/386
koplowańsk/1,387
kruž/386
kwas/386
kyrilisk/1,387
kós/386
kóz/382
kóńc/386
kóš/386
kšawj/1,379
lic/385
limborsk/1,387
malińsk/1,387
migracisk/1,387
muskelat/1,370
móc/385
mócowańsk/1,387
mórawj/1,379
měj/1,378
měs/385
nadgódnoś/377
nadleś/376
nadwój/388
nakup/375
naparow/373
naroź/377
nasajź/376
naskładowan/1,369
naslědowaŕsk/1,387
nawroś/377
nałušć/376
naśerp/373
nikak/388
njeblarj/1,379
njecazowj/1,379
njeclij/1,378
njedarj/1,379
njedobr/366
njedosajź/376
njedostśěl/373
njedozapłaś/376
njedozdrjal/375
njedozněj/1,378
njedośerp/373
njegjarbj/1,379
njegłos/386
njejadnak/388
njejagnj/1,379
njejź/1,383
njekopśiwj/1,379
njekśewj/1,379
njemucnj/1,379
njeměj/1,378
njenakomuź/376
njenasol/373
njenaswěś/376
njenowj/1,379
njepjerowj/1,379
njepopajź/376
njepódpušć/376
njepógnil/373
njepókisal/375
njepólodnj/1,379
njepórěź/377
njepósromoś/376
njepówól/373
njepśechójź/376
njepśemle/381
njepśepal/373
njepśerozsuź/376
njepśigroź/376
njepśijaśelsk/1,387
njepśimle/381
njepśipal/373
njepśisłoź/389
njepśiłagoź/389
njeraź/389
njeropj/1,379
njerozkósmaś/376
njerozmil/373
njeroznogaś/389
njeskisal/375
njeskringel/373
njeslobranj/1,379
njesnij/1,378
njespal/375
njespłaś/376
njetobj/1,379
njewawrj/1,379
njewobrub/373
njewobwěsć/376
njewomle/381
njewuból/373
njewuchójź/376
njewudal/375
njewuparow/373
njewuroź/377
njewuslěź/376
njewuzagadow/373
njewuzdrjal/375
njewóstuź/376
njewósław/373
njewótkal/375
njewótseś/376
njewótzastaj/373
njezadom/373
njezaleś/376
njezastup/373
njezazłosć/376
njezbadnj/1,379
njezdal/375
njezduchow/373
njezezdrjal/375
njezgóź/377
njezgłaź/376
njezněj/1,378
njezwab/373
nješemjerj/1,379
nješpicnj/1,379
nješćěrj/1,379
nos/386
nunwj/1,379
optikaŕsk/1,387
pas/380
pismamudr/1,370
pjac/380
powroś/377
połmarznjon/1,369
połnomócnj/1,379
połnozmócnjon/1,370
premonstratensaŕsk/1,387
prěc/385
póchyś/376
pódpłaś/377
pókisal/375
pókup/375
pókšaw/373
póroź/377
pórěź/377
póskoboź/376
pósol/374
pówjelik/1,387
póžyw/373
pśebroź/377
pśechójź/376
pśedrozsuź/377
pśekomuź/377
pśekup/375
pśemle/381
pśeroź/377
pśesmuź/376
pśewobroś/377
pśewóź/377
pśełap/373
pśikmótšowaŕsk/1,387
pśikup/375
pśimle/381
pśipórěź/376
pśipłaś/377
pśiroź/377
pśisłoź/389
pśiłagoź/389
pśiźěl/374
pšos/385
ran/366
raź/389
robj/1,379
rozebal/373
rozglědowaŕsk/1,387
rozhelon/1,370
rozmóź/377
roznogaś/389
samopalon/1,370
schójź/376
sedymźaseśor/1,369
silurisk/1,387
skisal/375
sklij/373
skomuź/377
slěpc/386
slěpj/1,379
snij/1,378
sobudrogujuc/1,370
sobujěźec/1,370
spal/375
stor/365
studentsk/1,387
styrźasćor/1,369
słap/373
tak/388
telik/388
torj/1,379
towariš/386
trampowańsk/1,387
tśiźasćor/1,369
wobcakańsk/1,387
wobgroź/377
wobsajź/376
wobsol/373
wobswěś/377
wobznanjec/1,370
womle/381
wopak/388
wopusć/377
wuchwal/373
wuchyś/376
wudal/375
wugóź/377
wukup/375
wunosowańsk/1,387
wuraź/377
wurop/373
wustuź/376
wusuź/377
wuzdrjal/375
wuznojon/1,369
wušum/373
wuźěl/374
wósol/374
wóstuź/377
wósymźaseśor/1,369
wótchójź/376
wótkal/375
wótkup/375
wótpłaś/377
wótroź/377
wótsmal/373
wóttergańsk/1,387
wótškóź/376
wěrj/1,379
wšak/388
wšykn/1,372
zabram/373
zabroź/377
zagroź/377
zaměsć/377
zapłaś/377
zasmal/373
zastacon/1,370
zaswěś/376
zawaź/377
zawroś/377
zažarbowańsk/1,387
zběl/373
zdal/375
zezdrjal/375
zgněś/376
zgromaź/377
zněj/1,378
zwab/373
zwaź/377
śmj/1,379
šer/366
šesćźaseśor/1,369
šlichojsk/1,387
špjerj/1,379
šwigerstarjejš/1,370
ź/384
źewjeśźaseśor/1,369
žeborj/1,379
